District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.27

Fines and penalties; criminal violations.

(a)

Any person who violates any provision of this subchapter shall, upon conviction, be subject to imprisonment not to exceed one year, a fine not to exceed $10,000, or both.

(b)

Any person who has been previously convicted under this subchapter shall, upon conviction, be subject to imprisonment not to exceed one year, a fine not to exceed $25,000, or both.

(c)

The fines set forth in this section shall not be limited by [§ 22-3571.01].

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1002, 46 DCR 3142
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 112(f), 60 DCR 2064

History

1981 Ed., § 47-2853.27.

Prior Codifications

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 added (c).

Effect of Amendments

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 112(f) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).

Emergency Legislation

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.

Editor's Notes